Massachusetts, session 194th, S330.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 74 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 5B the 
following section:-    
Section 5C. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 
following meanings:    
“Eligible applicant”, a student that meets the requirements to be promoted to the 
applicable grade. Any admission offered to an applicant before having been promoted to the 
applicable grade shall be contingent only upon promotion.     
“Department”, the department of elementary and secondary education.    

of 3 9  (b) If there are more eligible applicants than spaces available from a sending community 
for admission to a vocational-technical school or vocational-technical program within a 
vocational-technical school or comprehensive high school, whether or not the program is 
approved under this Chapter and including exploratory programs, the school shall hold a lottery 
to determine which of the sending community’s applicants shall be admitted.    
(c) Each school district may consider attendance and discipline for entry to the lottery.   
(d) Each school shall place eligible applicants who entered the lottery but were not 
admitted on a waitlist, the order of which shall be determined by the lottery. The waitlist shall 
include the names, home address, telephone number and grade level of such students and any 
other information the department deems necessary. The school shall forward the waitlist to the 
department of education no later than June 1 in the year in which the lottery is held. The 
department shall maintain a consolidated waitlist in order to determine the number of individual 
students in each city or town seeking admission to vocational-technical education schools and 
programs. If a school fills a vacancy after the initial admissions cycle is completed, said school 
shall fill the vacancy with the next available student on the waitlist and shall continue through 
the waitlist until a student fills the vacant seat.    
(e) The commissioner shall collect application, admission, enrollment, and waitlist data 
pertaining to at a minimum race, ethnicity, students with disabilities, economically 
disadvantaged students, and English language learners. The commissioner shall also collect data 
on the number of students enrolled in each vocational technical education program receiving 
services pursuant to chapter 71A, chapter 71B or both. The commissioner shall annually file said 

of 3 30 data with the clerks of the house and senate and the joint committee on education and make said 
data available to the public online not later than November 1.    
(f) The board shall promulgate regulations for implementation and enforcement of this 
section.